src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_PREVERBS_KO_GATEWAY
@P.NUMERAL.VERB@                V_PREVERBS_ASPECT ; !can pick up other preverbs on the way to becoming a verb or a verbal noun, but we want to stop ko from sneaking in to verbs as an "other preverb", so it will be checked at the other point of entry into CARDINALS
@R.Ccnj@@P.NUMERAL.VERB@    CARDINALS ; !also need to stop all preverbs BESIDES ccnj from preceding in numerals ... but not on numerical verbs

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_RELATIVE_ORDER_SET
@P.Order.Cnj@   V_PREVERBS_ASPECT ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_ASPECT
!{ uncertain of position
PV/ntami+:nitami-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 first [before others, i.e., relative position in a sequence]" ; !Rand key:n73099772452n
PV/bgami+:bagami-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 become, commence, arrive" ; !Rand key:n201132615-13-29n
PV/ekwaa+:ekwaa-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 finish" ; !Rand key:n73024180454n
PV/epiichi+:epiichi-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 while" ; !Rand key:n72972557481n
PV/gaagge+:gaagige-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 forever, for all time" ; !Rand key:n73016041873n
PV/giizhi+:giizhi-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 finish [doing something]" ; !Rand key:n73024238614n
PV/gji+:goji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 try [to do something]" ; !Rand key:n73024559959n
PV/jaagi+:jaagi-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 all, completely [gone]" ; !Rand key:n73028052357n
PV/megwaaji+:megwaaji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 in the middle [of doing something], in the process of [doing something]" ; !Rand key:n71429845986n
PV/mmendaaji+:mamendaaji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 want to do more of something" ; !Rand key:n73045650324n
PV/n'kawe+:nakawe-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 [do something] first [before doing something else], interrupt what one is doing [to do something]" ; !Rand key:n71433050533n
PV/ke+:oke-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 do something first [before doing something else], do something first [before resuming another activity]" ; !Rand key:n2011448-22-2n !PV/ke cannot have the UR /ke-/ (there should at least be a vowel first (oke in OPD))
PV/dede+:dede-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 enough" ; !Rand key:n201132719-28-57n
!}
PV/aazhoo+:aazhoo- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 next [period of time]";
PV/booni+:booni-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 quit [doing sth.], stop [doing sth.]";
PV/de+:dX2e-       V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 fair (amount), moderate (amount)"; !contains blocker to stop dye when ccnj
PV/ggwe+:gagwe- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 try to [do something]";
PV/ggweji+:gagweji-   V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 try to [do something], try and [do something], try [doing something]";
!DUP REMOVE!PV/kweji+:gagweji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 [see ggweji-]" ; !Rand key:n73032725062n
PV/kawe+:akawe-   V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 do something first [before doing something else], do something first [before resuming another activity]";
PV/maajii+:maajii-  V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 begin [to do something], start [to do something]";
PV/nda+:nanda-  V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 look [to do something], seek [to do something], in the hope of [something happening]";
PV/nda+:nando-  V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 look [to do something], seek [to do something], in the hope of [something happening]";
!DUP REMOVE!PV/ndo+:nando-  V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 [see nda-]"; 
!PV/nanda+:nda-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 look [to do something], seek [to do something], in the hope of [something happening]" ; !Rand key:n71431357611n
!PV/nando+:ndo-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 [see nda-]" ; !Rand key:n71431444116n
PV/noonde+:noonde-  V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 before a goal is reached, in the attempt of something, before something was to happen, prematurely, unexpectedly";
PV/ntaa+:nitaa-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 be good at [something], do something well;  2 be prone to something, be inclined to do something, [do something] often;  3 know how to do something, be able to do something, can do something";
PV/shkwaa+:ishkwaa-  V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 after [doing something];  2 finish [doing something], quit [doing something], end [be over]";
PV/webi+:webi-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 begin [to do something], start [to do something]";
PV/shki+:oshki-   V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 first, for the first time, newly";
            V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY
        V_PREVERBS_MANNER ;
        V_PREVERBS_COUNTING ; 
            V_REDUPLICATION_GATEWAY    ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_MANNER
!{ uncertain of position
PV/o+:o-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 go [do something], go and [do something]" ; !Rand key:n71435144991n !need clarification on how this preverb is supposed to surface. does it just completely delete? no! finality trumps LR parse
PV/waanji+:waanji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 most, to the greatest degree" ; !Rand key:n73034029135n
PV/meyaaw+:meyaaw-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 most (superlative), -est" ; !Rand key:n103000677990n
PV/nshinaaji+:nishinaaji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 devastatingly" ; !Rand key:n73099738407n
PV/niibaa+:niibaa-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 at night" ; !Rand key:n71431746367n
PV/zaami+:ozaami-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 excessively, overly, too" ; !Rand key:n72977659543n
!DUP REMOVE!PV/zaami+:zaami-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 excessively, overly, too" ; !Rand key:n72977659543n
PV/zhki+:zhaki-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 damp" ; !Rand key:n73072872654n
PV/npaaji+:nipaaji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 mistakenly, incorrectly" ; !Rand key:n201012717-15-45n
PV/mchi+:michi-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 bare, plain, in the basic and simple manner" ; !Rand key:n20114817-49-43n
PV/ndami+:ondami-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 be busy with something, be preoccupied with something" ; !Rand key:n72989348365n
PV/nboodewi+:niboodewi-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 forlorn, lonely" ; !Rand key:n71431348823n
PV/mziwe+:miziwe-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 all in one unit, in a whole unit, whole" ; !Rand key:n73033330521n
PV/mde+:mVi1de-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 in the distance" ; !Rand key:n71429470804n
PV/mchiwe+:mVv1chiwe-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 instead;  2 by hand, from scratch, without mechanical aid" ; !Rand key:n71429457095n
PV/gweki+:gweki-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 change" ; !Rand key:n73031713691n
PV/gwiini+:gwiini-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 aimlessly, confusedly, indecisively, unsure of;  2 be unable to think of something [to do]" ; !Rand key:n71429248194n
PV/gnaaj+:gVo1naaj-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 beautiful, good-looking, pretty, handsome" ; !Rand key:n73029029776n
PV/aakwi+:aakawi-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 frequently, regularly" ; !Rand key:n72976564856n
PV/aan'ke+:aanike-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 in succession, in turn" ; !Rand key:n7297341155n
PV/aanji+:aanji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 over again" ; !Rand key:n72973362179n
PV/aanooji+:aanooji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 dreadfully" ; !Rand key:n73045823524n
PV/baashji+:baashiji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 over, to an excessive degree" ; !Rand key:n72915857109n
!DUP REMOVE!PV/bgwaji+:bagwaji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 [see bgoji-]" ; !Rand key:n72976865281n
PV/bgoji+:bagoji-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 wild" ; !Rand key:n72976865281n
PV/bzaani+:bizaani-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 quietly, in the sense of lacking noise, and extended metaphorically in Christian materials to encompass a life lacking turmoil" ; !Rand key:n72985145321n
!DUP REMOVE!PV/dami+:ondami-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 be busy with something, be preoccupied with something" ; !Rand key:n72989341555n
!DUP REMOVE!PV/dami+:odami-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 be busy with something, be preoccupied with something" ; !Rand key:n72989341555n
PV/gchitwaa+:gichitwaa-    V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 special, classy, gourmet" ; !Rand key:n73040248510n
PV/gbe+:gabe-  V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 all, throughout"; !DAB ADDITION (found in OPD, also there are gbe-X adverbs here)
!}
PV/nboodwewi+:niboodwewi- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 embarassedly" ;
PV/gnibi+:ginibi- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 quickly" ;
PV/aabji+:aabaji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 constantly, continually, keep [doing something], repeatedly"; !valentine 2001 doesn't mark all etymological vowels in this slot
PV/aapji+:aapaji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 very;  2 completely, entirely, fully";
PV/baakji+:baakaji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 irreversible, irreversibly";
PV/bchi+:bichi- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 accidentally, by mistake";
PV/bzaani+:bizaani- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 quietly, in the sense of lacking noise, and extended metaphorically in Christian materials to encompass a life lacking turmoil";
PV/dgo+:dago- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 along [with others], among [others], together [with others], with";
PV/gchi+:gichi- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 much, lots, extremely, great (in degree), very, hard (in sense of being extreme)";
PV/ggiibaaji+:gagiibaaji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 badly, foolishly";
PV/ggwetaani+:gagwetaani- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 exceedingly, extremely, awfully, so, terribly";
PV/gmooji+:gimooji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 covertly, secretly, sneakily, stealthily, on the sly";
PV/giimooji+:giimooji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 covertly, secretly, sneakily, stealthily, on the sly";
PV/maamiiko+:maamiiko- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 amazingly, remarkably";
PV/maamwi+:maamwi- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 all, all together, among them all";
PV/mmaandaa+:mamaandaa- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 amazing, incredible, miraculously";
!DUP REMOVE!PV/maandaa+:mamaandaa-   V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY    " 1 [see mmaandaa-]" ; !Rand key:n71429179571n
PV/niizaani+:niizaani- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 dangerous";
PV/npaaj+:nipaaj- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 incorrectly, the wrong way";
PV/wiiji+:wiiji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 with";
PV/wiinge+:wiinge- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 completely, entirely, thoroughly";
PV/maanaaji+:maanaaji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 bad, evil, harmful, wrong";
PV/mji+:maji- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 badly, evilly";
PV/mno+:mino- V_PREVERBS_MANNER_COUNTING_GATEWAY " 1 good, well;  2 nice, pleasant";
